Hawaii statutes.
[§6F-2] Judiciary history center;
establishment. There shall be established within the office of the
administrative director of the courts, for administrative purposes only, the
judiciary history center. The judiciary shall provide the center with facilities,
security, janitorial services, utilities, fiscal, and necessary legal
services. The center shall be located on the ground floor of the Ali‘iolani
Hale Building. [L 1990, c 211, pt of §3]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next